New Jersey, session 221, S4287.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A carrier that offers a health benefits plan in this State shall provide coverage, without any cost-sharing, to an insured individual for the donation of an organ after the insured individual is declared dead in accordance with the Declaration of Death Act, P.L.1991, c.90 (C.26:6A-1 et seq.) and: a.     the insured individual who is declared dead is registered as an organ donor through the organ donor registry established by the State; or b.    a representative of the insured individual who is declared dead, to include, but not be limited to, the named insured of the health benefits plan, if not the insured individual who is declared dead; a spouse; child who is at least 18 years of age; sibling; or legal guardian decides to donate an organ of the insured individual who is declared dead. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following enactment and shall apply to health benefits plans delivered, issued, executed or renewed on or after the effective date.